Illinois, session 104th, HB1032.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, and 7-14 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/7-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 7-1)7    Sec. 7-1. Use of force in defense of person. 8    (a) A person is justified in the use of force against 9another and does not have a duty to retreat when and to the 10extent that he reasonably believes that such conduct is 11necessary to defend himself or another against such other's 12imminent use of unlawful force. However, he is justified in 13the use of force which is intended or likely to cause death or 14great bodily harm only if he reasonably believes that such 15force is necessary to prevent imminent death or great bodily 16harm to himself or another, or the commission of a forcible 17felony and does not have a duty to retreat.18    (b) In no case shall any act involving the use of force 19justified under this Section give rise to any claim or 20liability brought by or on behalf of any person acting within 21the definition of "aggressor" set forth in Section 7-4 of this 22Article, or the estate, spouse, or other family member of such 23a person, against the person or estate of the person using such   HB1032- 2 -LRB104 03250 RLC 13272 b1justified force, unless the use of force involves willful or 2wanton misconduct. 3    (c) A person who is justified in the use of force, 4including the use of force that is intended or likely to cause 5death or great bodily harm, is immune from criminal 6prosecution and civil action for the use of force justified 7under subsection (a) of this Section. As used in this 8subsection (c), "criminal prosecution" includes charging or 9prosecuting the defendant. 10(Source: P.A. 93-832, eff. 7-28-04.) 11    (720 ILCS 5/7-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 7-2)12    Sec. 7-2. Use of force in defense of dwelling.13    (a) A person is justified in the use of force against 14another and does not have a duty to retreat when and to the 15extent that he reasonably believes that such conduct is 16necessary to prevent or terminate such other's unlawful entry 17into or attack upon a dwelling. However, he is justified in the 18use of force which is intended or likely to cause death or 19great bodily harm only if:20        (1) The entry is made or attempted in a violent, 21    riotous, or tumultuous manner, and he reasonably believes 22    that such force is necessary to prevent an assault upon, 23    or offer of personal violence to, him or another then in 24    the dwelling, or25        (2) He reasonably believes that such force is   HB1032- 3 -LRB104 03250 RLC 13272 b1    necessary to prevent the commission of a felony in the 2    dwelling.3    (b) In no case shall any act involving the use of force 4justified under this Section give rise to any claim or 5liability brought by or on behalf of any person acting within 6the definition of "aggressor" set forth in Section 7-4 of this 7Article, or the estate, spouse, or other family member of such 8a person, against the person or estate of the person using such 9justified force, unless the use of force involves willful or 10wanton misconduct.11     (c) A person who is justified in the use of force, 12including the use of force that is intended or likely to cause 13death or great bodily harm, is immune from criminal 14prosecution and civil action for the use of force justified 15under subsection (a) of this Section. As used in this 16subsection (c), "criminal prosecution" includes charging or 17prosecuting the defendant. 18(Source: P.A. 93-832, eff. 7-28-04.) 19    (720 ILCS 5/7-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 7-3)20    Sec. 7-3. Use of force in defense of other property. 21    (a) A person is justified in the use of force against 22another and does not have a duty to retreat when and to the 23extent that he reasonably believes that such conduct is 24necessary to prevent or terminate such other's trespass on or 25other tortious or criminal interference with either real   HB1032- 4 -LRB104 03250 RLC 13272 b1property (other than a dwelling) or personal property, 2lawfully in his possession or in the possession of another who 3is a member of his immediate family or household or of a person 4whose property he has a legal duty to protect. However, he is 5justified in the use of force which is intended or likely to 6cause death or great bodily harm only if he reasonably 7believes that such force is necessary to prevent the 8commission of a forcible felony.9    (b) In no case shall any act involving the use of force 10justified under this Section give rise to any claim or 11liability brought by or on behalf of any person acting within 12the definition of "aggressor" set forth in Section 7-4 of this 13Article, or the estate, spouse, or other family member of such 14a person, against the person or estate of the person using such 15justified force, unless the use of force involves willful or 16wanton misconduct.17    (c) A person who is justified in the use of force, 18including the use of force that is intended or likely to cause 19death or great bodily harm, is immune from criminal 20prosecution and civil action for the use of force justified 21under subsection (a) of this Section. As used in this 22subsection (c), "criminal prosecution" includes charging or 23prosecuting the defendant. 24(Source: P.A. 93-832, eff. 7-28-04.) 25    (720 ILCS 5/7-14)  (from Ch. 38, par. 7-14)  HB1032- 5 -LRB104 03250 RLC 13272 b1    Sec. 7-14. Affirmative defense. Except as otherwise 2provided in Sections 7-1, 7-2, and 7-3 of this Article, a A 3defense of justifiable use of force, or of exoneration, based 4on the provisions of this Article is an affirmative defense.5(Source: Laws 1961, p. 1983.)